Utah statutes.
78A-3-103.   Supreme Court -- Rulemaking, judges pro tempore, and practice of law.

(1)  The Supreme Court shall adopt rules of procedure and evidence for use in the courts of the state and shall by rule manage the appellate process.  The Legislature may amend the rules of procedure and evidence adopted by the Supreme Court upon a vote of two-thirds of all members of both houses of the Legislature.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided by the Utah Constitution, the Supreme Court by rule may authorize retired justices and judges and judges pro tempore to perform any judicial duties.  Judges pro tempore shall be citizens of the United States, Utah residents, and admitted to practice law in Utah.

(3)  The Supreme Court shall by rule govern the practice of law, including admission to practice law and the conduct and discipline of persons admitted to the practice of law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

